Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 COMPANION ANIMAL BOARD Section 1. new text begin [346.60] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of sections 346.60 to 346.65, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Animal rescue. new text end new text begin "Animal rescue" means any not-for-profit organization with tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that: new text end new text begin (1) is devoted to the rescue, care, and adoption of stray, abandoned, unwanted, displaced, or surrendered companion animals; new text end new text begin (2) uses private foster homes as the primary means of housing animals; and new text end new text begin (3) does not breed animals. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Animal shelter. new text end new text begin "Animal shelter" means any not-for-profit organization with tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that: new text end new text begin (1) is devoted to the rescue, care, and adoption of stray, abandoned, unwanted, displaced, or surrendered companion animals; new text end new text begin (2) operates a physical facility as the primary means of accepting and housing animals; and new text end new text begin (3) does not breed animals. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Board. new text end new text begin "Board" means the Companion Animal Board. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Cat. new text end new text begin "Cat" means a mammal that is wholly or in part of the species Felis domesticus. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Companion animal or pet. new text end new text begin "Companion animal" or "pet" has the meaning given in sections 343.20, subdivision 6; and 346.36, subdivision 6. Companion animal or pet includes a cat, a dog, and another animal kept as a pet, including a rabbit, a guinea pig, a ferret, a small rodent, a nonnative bird, a small nonvenomous amphibian or reptile, and any other nonagricultural domesticated animal. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Dog. new text end new text begin "Dog" means a mammal that is wholly or in part of the species Canis familiaris. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [346.61] COMPANION ANIMAL BOARD; PURPOSE. new text end new text begin (a) The Companion Animal Board is created to promote the welfare of cats, dogs, and other pets; serve individuals in the community who care for cats, dogs, and other pets; and support the human-animal bond. The board must administer and enforce sections 346.60 to 346.65. new text end new text begin (b) The authority of the board is limited to cats, dogs, and other animals kept as pets, including rabbits, guinea pigs, ferrets, small rodents, nonnative birds, small nonvenomous amphibians and reptiles, and other nonagricultural domesticated animals. new text end new text begin (c) The board has no authority or jurisdiction over: new text end new text begin (1) cattle, sheep, swine, goats, farmed Cervidae, poultry, or other animals used for food, agricultural products, or other agricultural uses; new text end new text begin (2) regulated animals, as defined in section 346.155, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (3) wild animals, as defined in section 97A.015, subdivision 55; and new text end new text begin (4) racehorses regulated under chapter 240. new text end new text begin (d) The board's authority does not interfere with or supersede the authority of the Board of Veterinary Medicine over the practice of veterinary medicine under chapter 156, or the authority of the Board of Animal Health to control and prevent dangerous and reportable diseases under chapter 35. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [346.62] BOARD STRUCTURE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Members; officers. new text end new text begin (a) The board consists of the following 13 members appointed by the governor who represent companion animal interests and experiences: new text end new text begin (1) four members who represent the practice of veterinary medicine as follows: new text end new text begin (i) two licensed veterinarians who practice veterinary medicine in this state; new text end new text begin (ii) one veterinarian employed by the Board of Animal Health; and new text end new text begin (iii) one veterinarian employed by the University of Minnesota College of Veterinary Medicine; new text end new text begin (2) four members who represent Minnesota communities, Tribes, and local governments, as follows: new text end new text begin (i) one county or municipal government employee who represents community needs and local governance; new text end new text begin (ii) one member who represents a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (iii) two at-large public members; new text end new text begin (3) three members who represent Minnesota animal shelters and animal rescues as follows: new text end new text begin (i) one member who is employed by or who is a board member of a licensed animal shelter located in the seven-county metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (ii) one member who is employed by or who is a board member of a licensed animal shelter located in greater Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (iii) one member who is employed by or who is a board member of a Minnesota animal rescue; new text end new text begin (4) one member who is a licensed Minnesota commercial cat or dog breeder; and new text end new text begin (5) one member who is a licensed social worker or mental health professional, or is an individual who is knowledgeable about human welfare issues and interactions with companion animals. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal; vacancies. new text end new text begin The membership terms, compensation, removal of members, and filling of vacancies on the board are governed by section 15.0575. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Executive director; employees. new text end new text begin The board must appoint and employ an executive director who is not a member of the board to serve at the pleasure of the board. The board must set the duties of the executive director and employ, upon recommendation of the executive director, licensed veterinarians and other staff as necessary to carry out the board's duties. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [346.63] DUTIES OF THE BOARD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Regulatory enforcement. new text end new text begin The board must enforce state laws that regulate companion animals as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the licensing and inspection of cat and dog kennels and dealers and the enforcement of sections 347.31 to 347.40 and any rules adopted pursuant to those sections; and new text end new text begin (2) the licensing and inspection of commercial breeders and the enforcement of sections 347.57 to 347.65 and any rules adopted pursuant to those sections. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Education and communication. new text end new text begin The board must provide expertise about companion animal issues and promote responsible pet ownership through providing information, education, and communication. Duties include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) establishing and maintaining a website that provides information and resources for the public on issues related to companion animal care and welfare; new text end new text begin (2) providing expertise and assistance to other state government agencies and local governments on issues related to companion animals, including emergency and disaster relief, community cat programs, temporary pet housing, and other needs; and new text end new text begin (3) supporting and promoting humane education and outreach campaigns related to companion animal care and welfare. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Services and resources. new text end new text begin (a) The board must promote the welfare of companion animals and provide long-term efficiencies and collaboration in the animal welfare and human welfare fields. new text end new text begin (b) The board must determine community and statewide needs for the welfare of companion animals. The board must support the welfare of companion animals by collecting, analyzing, and disseminating quantitative and qualitative data related to companion animals and their care. new text end new text begin (c) Based on the board's findings regarding the needs for the welfare of companion animals under paragraph (b), the board may establish statewide programs or collaborate with and assist in the delivery of services and resources provided by Minnesota-based: new text end new text begin (1) nonprofit organizations; new text end new text begin (2) local governments; new text end new text begin (3) veterinary clinics or practices; and new text end new text begin (4) postsecondary institutions with a mission or programs supporting the welfare of companion animals or the human-animal bond. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin (a) The board must administer a grant program. The scope and purpose of the grants, to the extent possible, is to provide funding that allows a grantee to achieve measurable outcomes in the care and welfare of companion animals. new text end new text begin (b) The board may make grants from money available in the companion animal account to assist entities identified in subdivision 3, paragraph (c), and to support the board's duties under subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end new text begin (c) The board must determine grant priorities and administer the grant program in compliance with sections 16B.97 to 16B.991. Grants may include but are not limited to financial assistance for veterinary services and training, animal shelter management, capital expenses, equipment, pet care education, and other needs as defined by the board under subdivision 3, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) The board must report annually by February 15 to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over companion animals on grants made under this subdivision during the previous calendar year. The report must include the amount of grant money that the board issued, the geographic distribution of grants, and measurable outcomes including but not limited to the number of companion animals served. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin On or before January 15 each year, the board must publish and make available an annual report. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [346.64] AUTHORITY OF BOARD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Rulemaking authority. new text end new text begin The board may adopt rules necessary to carry out the powers, duties, and responsibilities given to the board under section 346.63, subdivision 1, clauses (1) and (2). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Advisory task force. new text end new text begin The board may create an advisory task force under section 15.014 with a majority of members who have a working knowledge of companion animal health and welfare issues. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certificates of veterinary inspection. new text end new text begin The Board of Animal Health must provide a copy of each new certificate of veterinary inspection for companion animals to the Companion Animal Board within 30 days of receiving the certificate of veterinary inspection. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Money received. new text end new text begin The board may accept gifts or other financial contributions from any source to support the board's purposes and duties. The board may apply for and accept grants of money from the United States, the state, a subdivision of the state, any foundation, or any private person to support the board's purposes and duties. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, except subdivisions 2 and 4 are effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [346.65] COMPANION ANIMAL ACCOUNT; APPROPRIATION. new text end new text begin A companion animal account is created in the special revenue fund. All fees and penalties collected by the board and, except as provided in section 4.07, subdivision 3, any money received by the board as gifts, grants, or other private or public funds must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the companion animal account. Money in the account, including interest on the account, is appropriated to the board to administer and award grants under sections 346.60 to 346.65. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin TRANSFER OF DUTIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Transfer. new text end new text begin (a) The responsibility to administer the duties listed in clauses (1) and (2) is transferred from the Board of Animal Health to the Companion Animal Board effective July 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) the licensing, enforcement, and inspection of kennels and dealers under Minnesota Statutes, sections 347.31 to 347.40, and Minnesota Rules, part 1721.0520; and new text end new text begin (2) the licensing, enforcement, and inspection of commercial breeders under Minnesota Statutes, sections 347.57 to 347.65. new text end new text begin (b) The transfer required under this section is pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039, except the transfer of unexpended money under Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039, subdivision 6, and the transfer of personnel under Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039, subdivision 7, do not apply. new text end new text begin (c) The Board of Animal Health must provide the Companion Animal Board with access to data, documentation, and record keeping, including data classified as nonpublic, if the data, documentation, or record keeping is related to the duties being transferred from the Board of Animal Health to the Companion Animal Board. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin No later than February 1, 2026, the executive director of the Board of Animal Health and the executive director of the Companion Animal Board must jointly report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government regarding the status of the transfer required under subdivision 1, including whether the directors recommend that the legislature modify the effective date of the transfer. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin RULEMAKING AUTHORITY.new text end new text begin The Companion Animal Board must amend Minnesota Rules, parts 1721.0490 and 1721.0520, to make conforming changes related to the transfer of duties under section 7. The Companion Animal Board may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section, and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin INITIAL APPOINTMENT OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.new text end new text begin The Companion Animal Board must appoint an executive director no later than six months after the governor appoints the initial board members. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMPANION ANIMAL BOARD.new text end new text begin $2,854,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,057,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Companion Animal Board to perform the board's duties under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 346. Of the amount appropriated each year, at least: new text end new text begin (1) $250,000 is for the grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 346.63, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (2) $750,000 is for a pilot program administered under Minnesota Statutes, section 346.63, subdivision 4. The allocation in this clause is onetime. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin Except as provided in article 2, section 2, the revisor of statutes must change the terms "Board of Animal Health" or "board" to "Companion Animal Board" and make any corresponding changes in Minnesota Statutes, sections 346.55, 346.58, 347.31 to 347.40, and 347.57 to 347.65. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Unless otherwise specified, this article is effective July 1, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 2 CONFORMING CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members; officers. The board has seven members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, three of whom are producers of livestock in the state; one of whom is a member of a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota who is experienced in animal husbandry; and three of whom are practicing veterinarians licensed in Minnesota, one of whom specializes in companion animals. To the extent practicable, the governor's appointments must achieve gender and geographic balance among the board membership. The commissioners of agriculture, natural resources, and health, the dean of the College of Veterinary Medicine, new text begin the executive director of the Companion Animal Board, new text end and the director of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory of the University of Minnesota may serve as consultants to the board without vote. Appointments to fill unexpired terms must be made from the classes to which the retiring members belong. The board shall elect a president and a vice-president from among its members and a veterinarian licensed in Minnesota who is not a member to be its executive director for a term of one year and until a successor qualifies. The board shall set the duties of the director. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.58, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Veterinary protocol. (a) A commercial breeder must establish and maintain a written protocol for disease control and prevention, euthanasia, and veterinary care of animals at each facility. The initial protocol must be developed under the direction and supervision of new text begin the Companion Animal Board with oversight from a veterinarian employed by new text end the new text begin Companion Animal new text end Board. A commercial breeder must maintain a written protocol that is updated at least every 12 months and that is signed and dated by the new text begin Companion Animal new text end Board or by a veterinarian along with the commercial breeder. The written protocol must be available to the new text begin Companion Animal new text end Board upon request or at the time of inspection.new text begin The Companion Animal Board must provide a copy of each veterinary protocol to the Board of Animal Health. The Companion Animal Board must defer to the Board of Animal Health on all matters related to the control and prevention of dangerous, reportable diseases, including the initial protocol.new text end (b) An animal sold or otherwise distributed by a commercial breeder must be accompanied by a veterinary health certificate completed by a veterinarian. The certificate must be completed within 30 days prior to the sale or distribution and must indicate that the animal is current with vaccinations and has no signs of infectious or contagious diseases. The certificate accompanying an adult dog that was not spayed or neutered must indicate that the dog has no signs of infectious or contagious diseases and was tested for canine brucellosis with a test approved by the Boardnew text begin of Animal Healthnew text end and found to be negative.new text begin The Companion Animal Board must immediately report and provide copies of all disease-related testing, including canine brucellosis and other dangerous, reportable diseases, to the Board of Animal Health.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end